Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1209
Program participants; application assistance.

The Secretary of State shall designate state and local agencies and nonprofit entities that provide counseling and shelter services to victims of abuse, sexual assault, kidnapping, stalking, or trafficking to assist persons applying to be program participants. Any assistance or counseling rendered by the office of the Secretary of State or its designees to such applicants shall not be deemed legal advice or the practice of law.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB280, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB691, § 4.